Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1219
Department; additional rules and regulations.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to:

(1) Administer the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act;

(2) Establish procedures and requirements for applications for licensure, renewal, and reinstatement in any of the licensure classifications created pursuant to the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act;

(3) Provide for the inspection, review, and termination of approval of training agencies. All training for licensure shall be provided through an approved training agency; and

(4) Provide for the inspection, review, and termination of basic life support emergency medical services and advanced life support emergency medical services.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 503;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 15;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 23.